California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) For purposes of this section, in a school or other educational program that does not provide letter grades indicating student performance, satisfactory progress or inadequate progress shall be determined by the school’s regular assessment of periodic progress.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 615, Sec. 8.   (SB 521)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11334.2.

Sanctions and bonuses pursuant to Section 11333.7 shall be applied in the first quarter following participant notification of program requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 1999.   As prescribed in former Section 11334.8, this section (as part of Article 3.5) resumed full operation on April 1, 2013, after a period of inoperation or limited operation.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11334.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 11322 and 11322.2, the state shall fund 100 percent of the nonfederal share of case management and supportive services provided under the Cal-Learn program. The net costs of bonuses and sanctions provided pursuant to Section 11330.10 shall be subject to the same financial participation as payment under subdivision (a) of Section 11450, and administrative cost associated with applying these bonuses and sanctions shall be subject to the financial participation specified in Section 15204.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 69, Sec. 36.   Effective June 30, 1993.   As prescribed in former Section 11334.8, this section (as part of Article 3.5) resumed full operation on April 1, 2013, after a period of inoperation or limited operation.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11334.51.

(a) The department shall reduce the allocation of money from Items 5180-151-001 and 5180-151-890 of the Budget Act with respect to any county to which both of the following apply:

(1) The county did not have an approved Cal-Learn county plan pursuant to Section 11333.5 as of April 1, 1995, or subsequently amends the plan in the manner set forth in paragraph (2).

(2) The county has taken action to enter into an agreement with the department for less than full implementation of this article and an agreement is in effect on July 1, 1996.

(b) The amount of the reduction required by subdivision (a) shall be an amount equal to three times the full cost incurred by the department to implement the affected function.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 307, Sec. 6.   Effective August 3, 1995.   As prescribed in former Section 11334.8, this section (as part of Article 3.5) resumed full operation on April 1, 2013, after a period of inoperation or limited operation.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11334.6.

(a) The department shall provide to the budget committees of the Legislature, no later than February 1, 2013, and, notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on February 1 annually thereafter, a report that includes all of the following information:

(1) The number of counties implementing a Cal-Learn Program.

(2) The number of recipients being served in each county with intensive case management services.

(3) Outcomes for recipients, including graduation rates and repeat pregnancies.

(b) The report described in subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 22.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11334.7.

The director may provide funds to support this article in an item separate from other welfare-to-work activities, and these funds shall not be subject to Section 11322.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1999.   As prescribed in former Section 11334.8, this section (as part of Article 3.5) resumed full operation on April 1, 2013, after a period of inoperation or limited operation.   Note: Former Section 11334.8 was last amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, before its repeal on April 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.6. New Chance Program [11336. - 11336.]

11336.

County GAIN programs shall cooperate with the department and the State Department of Education in the provision and coordination of services under the New Chance Program at program sites. To the extent consistent with the county plan adopted pursuant to Section 11320.2, county programs shall provide supportive services, and, if not available from other sources, education and training services, to teenage parents who participate in the New Chance Program. These services shall be administered in a manner which is consistent with services provided under the New Chance Program at program sites.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 931, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. CalWORKs Educational Opportunity and Attainment Program [11340. - 11346.]

11340.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the CalWORKs Educational Opportunity and Attainment Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 30.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 11346.)
-------------------------------------------

11341.

(a) A CalWORKs recipient may apply to receive a one-time education incentive award in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) for completion of a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(b) (1) A CalWORKs recipient may apply to receive a one-time education stipend totaling one thousand dollars ($1,000) for enrollment in a term of an education or training program leading to a career technical education program certificate, an associate’s degree, or a bachelor’s degree.

(2) The stipend described in paragraph (1) shall be paid to a CalWORKs recipient at the outset of the term for which he or she is registered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 30.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 11346.)
-------------------------------------------

11342.

(a) (1) A CalWORKs recipient who applies for an education incentive award pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11341 shall submit evidence of completion of the high school educational program to the county.

(2) Upon verification of completion of the high school educational program described in paragraph (1), the county shall pay the recipient the award described in subdivision (a) of Section 11341 in the month following receipt of the record of completion, if submitted by the 11th day of the month, or in the second month following receipt of the record of completion if submitted later than the 11th day of the month.

(b) (1) A CalWORKs
 recipient who applies for an education stipend described in subdivision (b) of Section 11341 shall submit evidence of enrollment to the county. A recipient is not eligible unless all of the following criteria are satisfied:

(A) The recipient is enrolled in an education or training program that is included in the recipient’s welfare-to-work plan approved by the county.

(B) The recipient is enrolled in an education or training program consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 11325.23.

(C) The recipient is enrolled in an education or training program described in subdivision (b) of Section 11341 while receiving CalWORKs assistance.

(2) Within 10 business days of verifying that a recipient is enrolled in an education or training program as described in
 paragraph (1), the county shall certify that the recipient is eligible for the education stipend and shall issue the stipend payment to the recipient.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 30.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 11346.)
-------------------------------------------

11343.

(a) A CalWORKs recipient who is receiving an education incentive award or education stipend but then ceases to receive CalWORKs assistance is not eligible for the same education incentive award if he or she begins receiving CalWORKs assistance in the future.

(b) A CalWORKS recipient is permanently ineligible for an education incentive award or education stipend under either of the following circumstances:

(1) The recipient has exhausted his or her CalWORKS benefits.

(2) The recipient has committed public assistance fraud, as described in Article 7 (commencing with Section 11476.6).

(c) A CalWORKs recipient shall not receive an education award or education stipend in any month during which he or she is sanctioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 30.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 11346.)
-------------------------------------------

11345.

The education incentive awards and stipends authorized pursuant to this article are not entitlement benefits. A county is required to comply with the provisions of this article only to the extent funding for this purpose is appropriated in the annual Budget Act and available to the county. A county shall not be required to expend county funds for the provision of education incentive awards and stipends pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 30.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 11346.)
-------------------------------------------

11346.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 30.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: Delayed operative date applies to Article 3.7 commencing with Section 11340.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.9. Employment with Public Contractors [11349. - 11349.4.]

11349.

In complying with Section 10353 of the Public Contract Code, a contractor shall give priority consideration to qualified recipients of aid under this chapter. For purposes of this article, priority consideration means that a contractor shall hire all qualified job applicants who are recipients of aid under this chapter and who apply within five working days of the listing of the job opening with the Employment Development Department, before hiring any other applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1259, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11349.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, participation by a recipient of aid under this chapter, shall be voluntary only, and in no event shall any person be subject to sanctions, through loss of benefits or eligibility, for not applying for, accepting, or continuing in such a position.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1259, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11349.2.

Contractors shall immediately list with the appropriate local office of the Employment Development Department all suitable employment openings in positions funded by a contract subject to Section 10353 of the Public Contract Code. The Employment Development Department shall advise qualified recipients of aid of these openings and shall refer them to the contractor within five working days from the listing of the openings. The Employment Development Department shall advise recipients of aid of the voluntary nature of an application for such an opening, and that the recipients shall have priority in being hired for these openings, provided the recipient possesses all the necessary skills and meets all requirements of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1259, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11349.3.

This article and Section 10353 of the Public Contract Code may be waived by the Governor, if requested to do so by the state agency involved, in order to address an emergency which threatens the public health or safety, the state’s natural resources, or the economy. If an emergency waiver is granted, notification including reasons for the waiver shall be forwarded to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within five working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1259, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11349.4.

In the event that the State Department of Social Services determines that a waiver of any federal regulations or policies, or both, are required to fulfill the provisions of this article, the department shall seek those waivers. If the waivers necessary are not granted by March 1, 1985, the department shall report on the barriers to the waivers and the expected date of waiver approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1259, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Relatives’ Responsibility [11351.5. - 11353.]

11351.5.

Whenever an unrelated adult male resides with a family applying for or receiving aid under this chapter, he shall be required to make a financial contribution to the family which shall not be less than it would cost him to provide himself with an independent living arrangement.

The minimum financial contribution to the family shall be determined in accordance with standards established by the department which takes into account such adult male person’s income and expenses. The regulations formulated by the department shall require the mother of the children and the unrelated male to present all of the facts in connection with the sharing of expenses which comprise the agreement whereby said adult male resides with the family. The conditions of the agreement and the facts related to the sharing of the family expenses shall be signed under penalty of perjury by both the mother of the child and the unrelated male. In the event that either the mother or the adult male person willfully and knowingly fails to cooperate during the period such joint sharing of expenses arrangement exists in setting forth all of the facts in accordance with provisions of this section, aid to the family may be discontinued.

The provisions of this section do not apply to a bona fide paying lodger, roomer or boarder living in the home of a family applying for or receiving aid under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1417.)
-------------------------------------------

11353.

Any parent whose absence is the basis upon which an application is filed for aid in behalf of a child shall complete and return to the county within 15 days after service pursuant to Section 11476 a written statement of his current monthly income, his total income over the past 12 months, a description of all real and personal property owned by him, together with an estimate of its value, the number of dependents for whom he is providing support, the amount he is contributing regularly, toward the support of all children for whom application for aid is made under this chapter, his social security number, his current monthly living expenses and such other information as is pertinent to determining his ability to support his children.

A violation of this section constitutes a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payment Program [11360. - 11379.]

11360.

Effective on the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 11217, the department shall establish a state-funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payment Program as specified in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.   This section also became operative on January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 11379.)
-------------------------------------------

11361.

The Legislature finds and declares that the continuation of the state-funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payment Program is intended to enhance family preservation and stability by recognizing that some dependent children and wards of the juvenile court who are not otherwise eligible under Subtitle IV-E (commencing with Section 470) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) are in long-term, stable placements with relatives, that these placements are the permanent plan for the child, that dependencies can be dismissed pursuant to Section 366.3 with legal guardianship granted to the relative, and that there is no need for continued governmental intervention in the family life through ongoing, scheduled court and social services supervision of the placement. Continuation of the state-funded Kin-GAP Program is necessary to ensure that wards and dependent children of the juvenile court whose placement in the home of an approved relative are equally eligible for the benefits derived from legal permanency with the related guardian and that the state can maximize improvements to federal permanency outcome measures by exiting nonfederally eligible youth to the state’s subsidized kinship guardianship program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 45.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11362.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payments (Kin-GAP)” means the state-funded aid provided under the terms of this article on behalf of children in kinship care who are not eligible for federally funded Kin-GAP pursuant to Section 11385.

(b) “Kinship guardian” means a person who (1) has been appointed the legal guardian of a dependent child pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26, or a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 728 and (2) is a relative of the child.

(c) “Relative” means an adult who is related to the child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the
 fifth degree of kinship, including stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,” “great-great,” or “grand” or the spouse of any of those persons even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution.

(d) “Approved home of the prospective relative guardian” means any of the following:

(1) The home of a relative who has been approved as a resource family home pursuant to Section 16519.5 of this code or Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The home of a relative
 who has been approved as a tribally approved home, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 224.1.

(3) The home of a relative who has been assessed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 361.3 and Section 361.4, and into which the juvenile court has authorized placement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 46.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11363.

(a) Aid in the form of state-funded Kin-GAP shall be provided under this article on behalf of any child under 18 years of age and to any eligible youth under 19 years of age, as provided in Section 11403, who satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) Has been adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, or, effective October 1, 2006, a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602.

(2) Has been residing for at least six consecutive months in the approved home of the prospective relative guardian, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 11362, while under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or a voluntary placement agreement.

(3) Has had a kinship guardianship established pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26.

(4) Has had their dependency jurisdiction terminated after January 1, 2000, pursuant to Section 366.3, or their wardship terminated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to the establishment of the kinship guardianship.

(b) If the conditions specified in subdivision (a) are met and, subsequent to the termination of dependency jurisdiction, any parent or person having an interest files with the juvenile court a petition pursuant to Section 388 to change, modify, or set aside an order of the court, Kin-GAP payments shall continue unless and until the juvenile court, after holding a hearing, orders the child removed from the home of the guardian, terminates the guardianship, or resumes dependency jurisdiction after the court concludes the hearing on the petition filed under Section 388.

(c) A child or nonminor former dependent or ward shall be eligible for Kin-GAP payments if the child or nonminor former dependent meets one of the following age criteria:

(1) The person is under 18 years of age.

(2) The person is
 under 21 years of age and has a physical or mental disability that warrants the continuation of assistance.

(3) Through December 31, 2011, the person satisfies the conditions of Section 11403, and on and after January 1, 2012, the person satisfies the conditions of Section 11403.01.

(4) The person satisfies the conditions as described in subdivision (d).

(d) Commencing January 1, 2012, state-funded Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and who are under 19 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced, and as described in Section
 10103.5. Effective January 1, 2013, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 20 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced, and as described in Section 10103.5. Effective January 1, 2014, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 21 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced. To be eligible for continued payments, the youth shall satisfy one or more of the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.

(e) (1) Termination of the guardianship with a kinship guardian shall terminate eligibility for Kin-GAP unless the conditions in Section 11403 apply. However, an alternate guardian or coguardian is appointed pursuant to Section 366.3 who is also a kinship
 guardian, the alternate or coguardian shall be entitled to receive Kin-GAP on behalf of the child pursuant to this article. A new period of six months of placement with the alternate guardian or coguardian shall not be required if that alternate guardian or coguardian has been assessed pursuant to Section 361.3, subdivision (a) of Section 361.4, and paragraph (2), and the court terminates dependency jurisdiction. If a nonminor former dependent is receiving Kin-GAP after 18 years of age and the nonminor former dependent’s former guardian dies, the nonminor former dependent may petition the court for a hearing pursuant to Section 388.1.

(2) (A) In addition to the state-level criminal records check described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.4, the county welfare department shall require each prospective alternate guardian or coguardian, and any other person over 18 years of age living in the home, to be
 fingerprinted, and shall secure from an appropriate law enforcement agency any criminal record of that person to determine whether the person has ever been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation.

(B) If the criminal records check indicates that the prospective alternate guardian or coguardian has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the case shall not be eligible for Kin-GAP funding.

(C) If the prospective alternate guardian or coguardian has been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation or arrested for an offense specified in subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, except for the civil penalty language, the criminal background check provisions specified in subdivisions (d) to (g), inclusive, of Section 1522 of the
 Health and Safety Code shall apply, and an exemption shall be issued prior to issuance of any Kin-GAP funding. Exemptions from the criminal records clearance requirements set forth in this section may be granted by the county using the exemption criteria specified in subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code and any applicable written directives or regulations adopted by the department.

(3) A prospective alternate guardian or coguardian shall not be required to be approved as a resource family pursuant to Section 16519.5 for the sole purpose of receiving Kin-GAP funding on behalf of an eligible child in the care of the prospective alternate guardian or coguardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 47.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11364.

(a) In order to receive payments under this article, the county child welfare agency, probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1, shall negotiate and enter into a written, binding, kinship guardianship assistance agreement with the relative guardian of an eligible child, and provide the relative guardian with a copy of the agreement.

(b) The agreement shall specify, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The amount of and manner in which the kinship guardianship assistance payment will be provided under the agreement, and that the amount is subject to any applicable increases pursuant to
 cost-of-living adjustments established by statute, and the manner in which the agreement may be adjusted periodically, but no less frequently than every two years, in consultation with the relative guardian, based on the circumstances of the relative guardian and the needs of the child.

(2) Additional services and assistance for which the child and relative guardian will be eligible under the agreement.

(3) A procedure by which the relative guardian may apply for additional services, as needed, including the filing of a petition under Section 388 to have dependency jurisdiction resumed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 366.3.

(4) That the agreement shall remain in effect regardless of the state of residency of the relative guardian.

(5) The
 responsibility of the relative guardian for reporting changes in the needs of the child or the circumstances of the relative guardian that affect payment.

(6) For guardianships established on and after January 1, 2012, payment shall be made for reasonable and verified nonrecurring expenses associated with obtaining legal guardianship not to exceed the amount specified in federal law. Reimbursement shall not be made for costs otherwise reimbursed from other sources, including the foster care maintenance payment. The agreement shall indicate the maximum amount, the purpose of the expense, and the process for obtaining reimbursement of the nonrecurring expenses to be paid.

(c) In accordance with the Kin-GAP agreement, the relative guardian shall be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC
 or Approved Relative Caregiver payments and the circumstances of the relative guardian, but that shall not exceed the foster care maintenance payment that would have been paid based on the state-approved foster family home care rate and any applicable specialized care increment for a child placed in a licensed or approved family home pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 11461. In addition, the rate paid for a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment shall include an amount equal to the clothing allowance, as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 11461, including any applicable rate adjustments. For a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment who is a teen parent, the rate shall include the two-hundred-dollar ($200) monthly payment made to the relative caregiver in a whole family foster home pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11465.

(d) Commencing on the effective
 date of the act that added this subdivision, and notwithstanding subdivision (c), in accordance with the Kin-GAP agreement, the relative guardian shall be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC payments and the circumstances of the relative guardian, as follows:

(1) For cases in which the dependency has been dismissed pursuant to Section 366.3 or wardship has been terminated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to establishment of the guardianship, on or before June 30, 2011, or the date specified in a final order, for which the time to appeal has passed, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in California State Foster Parent Association, et al. v. William Lightbourne, et al. (U.S. Dist. Ct. No. C 07-05086 WHA), whichever is earlier, the rate paid shall not exceed the basic foster care maintenance payment rate structure in effect prior to the effective date
 specified in the order described in this paragraph.

(2) For cases in which dependency has been dismissed pursuant to Section 366.3 or wardship has been terminated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to establishment of the guardianship, on or after July 1, 2011, or the date specified in the order described in paragraph (1), whichever is earlier, and through December 31, 2016, the rate paid shall not exceed the basic foster care maintenance payment rate structure effective and available as of December 31, 2016.

(3) For cases in which dependency has been dismissed pursuant to Section 366.3 or wardship has been terminated pursuant to Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to establishment of the guardianship, on or after January 1, 2017, and before July 1, 2027,
 or
 the effective date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, as applicable, the rate paid shall not exceed the home-based family care rate structure developed pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11461 and Section 11463.

(4) (A) For cases in which dependency has been dismissed pursuant to Section 366.3 or wardship has been terminated pursuant to Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to establishment of the guardianship, on and after July 1, 2027, or the date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the rate paid shall not exceed Tier 1 of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, unless the
 conditions of subparagraph (B) apply.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the rate paid may exceed Tier 1, but shall not exceed Tier 2, of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, under specific conditions established by the department and based on assessed needs of the child.

(5) Beginning with the 2011–12 fiscal year, the Kin-GAP benefit payments rate structure shall be adjusted annually by the percentage change in the California Necessities Index, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 11461, without requiring a new agreement.

(6) In addition to the rate paid for a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment, a specialized care increment, if applicable, as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 11461, also shall be paid.

(7) In addition to the rate paid for a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment, a clothing allowance, as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 11461, also shall be paid.

(8) For a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment who is a teen parent, the rate shall include the two-hundred-dollar ($200) monthly payment made to the relative caregiver in a whole family foster home pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11465.

(e) The county child welfare agency, probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 shall provide the relative guardian with information, in writing, on the availability of the Kin-GAP program with an explanation of the difference between these benefits and Adoption Assistance Program
 benefits and AFDC-FC benefits. The agency shall also provide the relative guardian with information on the availability of mental health services through the Medi-Cal program or other programs.

(f) The county child welfare agency, probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization, as appropriate, shall assess the needs of the child and the circumstances of the related guardian and is responsible for determining that the child meets the eligibility criteria for payment.

(g) Payments on behalf of a child who is a recipient of Kin-GAP benefits and who is also a consumer of regional center services shall be based on the rates established by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 11464.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 14.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11366.

A child who is eligible to receive Medi-Cal benefits with no share of cost shall maintain that eligibility notwithstanding the receipt of state-funded Kin-GAP by his or her kinship guardian.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.   This section also became operative on January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 11379.)
-------------------------------------------

11367.

The supplemental clothing allowance shall be paid pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (f) of Section 11461.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.   This section also became operative on January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 11379.)
-------------------------------------------

11369.

(a) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement the applicable provisions of the state-funded Kin-GAP Program through all-county letters or similar instructions from the director.

(b) The director shall adopt regulations as otherwise necessary, to implement the applicable provisions of the Kin-GAP Program. Emergency regulations to implement the applicable provisions of this act may be adopted by the director in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The initial adoption of the emergency regulations and one readoption of the
 initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those emergency regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.   This section also became operative on January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 11379.)
-------------------------------------------

11370.

The county welfare department or probation department or Indian tribe, as appropriate, at the time of the Kin-GAP annual redetermination, shall meet with the relative guardian and the nonfederally eligible child and enter into a written agreement for the state-funded Kin-GAP program as described in Section 11364. This process shall continue for at least 12 calendar months or until all state-funded Kin-GAP cases as of the effective date described have been processed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.   This section also became operative on January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 11379.)
-------------------------------------------

11371.

Income to the child, including the state-funded Kin-GAP payment, shall not be considered income to the kinship guardian for purposes of determining the kinship guardian’s eligibility for any other aid program, unless required by federal law as a condition of the receipt of federal financial participation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.   This section also became operative on January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 11379.)
-------------------------------------------

11372.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state-funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payment Program implemented under this article is exempt from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3.

(b) Any exemptions exercised pursuant to this section shall be implemented in accordance with Section 11369.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 501, Sec. 12.   (AB 6)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11374.

(a) Each county that formally had court ordered jurisdiction under Section 300, 601, or 602 over a child receiving benefits under the state-funded Kin-GAP Program shall be responsible for paying the child’s aid regardless of where the child actually resides.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, when a child receiving benefits under the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program (ARC) pursuant to Section 11461.3 becomes eligible for benefits under the state-funded Kin-GAP Program during any month, the child shall continue to receive benefits under the ARC program, as appropriate, through the day that the juvenile court dismisses the dependency or terminates the wardship, and Kin-GAP payments shall begin the day following the day that the juvenile court dismisses the
 dependency or terminates the wardship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 273.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11375.

(a) Both of the following shall apply to any child or nonminor in receipt of state-funded Kin-GAP benefits:

(1) The child or nonminor is eligible to request and receive independent living services pursuant to Section 10609.3.

(2) Income or property received after the beginning date of receipt of Kin-GAP benefits shall be disregarded.

(b) Amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall become operative on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) can perform the necessary automation to implement the amendments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 15.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11376.

A foster child who has become the subject of a legal guardianship, who is receiving assistance under the Kin-GAP Program under this article or under Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), including Medi-Cal, and whose foster care court supervision has been terminated, shall be provided medically necessary specialty mental health services by the local mental health plan in the county of residence of his or her legal guardian, pursuant to all of the following:

(a) The host county mental health plan shall be responsible for submitting the treatment authorization request (TAR) to the mental health plan in the county of origin.

(b) The requesting public or private service provider shall prepare the TAR.

(c) The county of origin shall retain responsibility for authorization and reauthorization of services utilizing an expedited TAR process.
